District of Columbia statutes.
1-909.07

Retention of records.

The Retirement Board shall maintain records on the matters required to be disclosed under this subchapter, which shall provide in sufficient detail the necessary basic information and data from which the required documents may be verified, explained, or clarified, and checked for accuracy and completeness. These records shall include minutes of the meetings of the Retirement Board, vouchers, worksheets, receipts, and applicable resolutions. The Retirement Board shall keep the records available for examination for a period of not less than 6 years after the filing date of the documents based on the information which they contain. Except to the extent that the records involve matters protected from public disclosure under § 1-909.05, all records shall be available for inspection by the public.

History

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-152, § 147, 45 DCR 4045
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 113(a), 47 DCR 520

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-785.7.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91, in the first sentence, substituted “under this subchapter” for “under subchapter IV of this chapter”.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-152: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-901.01.